Tennessee, session 114, SB2674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Public Education Investments
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-306(a)(3), is amended by
deleting subdivision (D) and substituting:
(D) Fifty thousand two hundred ninety dollars ($50,290) for the 2026-2027
school year and each school year thereafter.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-105(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) The weighted allocation for a student who experiences concentrated poverty
is ten percent (10%);
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-909(d), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(d) Subject to the amounts appropriated by the general assembly and any
provision of law relating to a shortfall in funds available for postsecondary financial
assistance from the net proceeds of the state lottery, a Tennessee middle college
scholarship awarded to a student enrolled in middle college for full-time attendance is
two thousand sixty dollars ($2,060) for each semester in the 2026-2027 academic year
and increases by three percent (3%) for each academic year for nine (9) academic
years.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2674
011040
- 1 -